Utah statutes.
15-9-117.   Civil and administrative penalty.
(1)  The division may assess a civil penalty against an athlete agent not to
exceed $25,000 for a violation of this chapter.
(2)  An administrative penalty collected under Subsection (1) shall be
deposited into the Commerce Service Account created in Section 13-1-2.
